Virginia statutes. Title 64.1. Wills and Decedents’ Estates.
[Repealed.]

§§ 64.1-01 through 64.1-206.8.

Repealed by Acts 2012, c. 614, cl. 11, effective October 1, 2012.

Editor’s note.

This title was repealed by Acts 2012, c. 614, cl. 11, and recodified generally as Title 64.2 (§

64.2-100

et seq.), effective October 1, 2012.

Acts 2012, c. 614, effective October 1, 2012, recodified

Titles 26

, 31, and 64.1, as well as Chapters 10 (§

37.2-1000

et seq.) and 10.1 (§

37.2-1031

et seq.) of Title 37.2 and Chapters 2.1 (§ 55-34.1 et seq.), 15 (§ 55-268.11 et seq.), 15.1 (§ 55-277.1 et seq.), 16 (§ 55-278 et seq.), 22 (§ 55-401 et seq.), and 31 (§ 55-541.01 et seq.) of Title 55. In addition to revision by Acts 2012, c. 614, the recodified sections were also amended by other acts passed at the 2012 Session. As required by § 30-152, the Code Commission has incorporated the majority of these amendments into the new sections. Where appropriate, the historical citations and annotations to former sections have been added to corresponding new sections. For tables of corresponding former and new sections, see the tables in Volume 10.